West Virginia, session 2026, HB5612.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE  10. REAL ESTATE DIVISION. §5A-10-10. Real property review. (a) At least once every four years, the Real Estate Division shall review the inventory of real property for each state spending unit submitted pursuant to this article to verify the accuracy of the inventory records.(b) Based on the review of the inventory of real property, the Real Estate Division shall:(1) Identify any real property owned or leased by the state that is not being used or that is being substantially underused as designated by the department, agency, or institution of state government that reports the property as required by §5A-10-9 of this code;(2) Make recommendations to the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Administration regarding the use of real property, which shall include:(A) An analysis of the highest and best use to which the real property may legally be placed; and(B) An analysis of alternative uses of the real property addressing the potential for any other transaction or use that the Real Estate Division determines to be in the best interest of the state; and(3) Submit to the Governor and the Secretary of the Department of Administration any information pertinent to the evaluation of a potential transaction involving the real property, including an evaluation of any proposals received from private parties that would be of significant benefit to the state. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home